Utah statutes.
9-8-804.   Statute of limitations for claiming reposited materials from a
collecting institution.
(1)  Any reposited materials in a collecting institution that are not
accompanied by a transfer of title to those materials are considered a gift to
the collecting institution when more than 25 years have passed from the date
of the last written contact between the depositor or his successors and the
collecting institution.
(2)  No depositor or any of his successors may bring an action against the
collecting institution to recover the reposited materials from the collecting
institution after 25 years have passed from the date of the last written
contact between the depositor or his successors and the collecting
institution.
